Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.370

Construction contract provision waiving, releasing, etc., rights of contractor, etc., to damages or adjustment for unreasonable delay caused by contractee, etc.—"Construction contract" defined.

"Construction contract" for purposes of RCW 4.24.360 means any contract or agreement for the construction, alteration, repair, addition to, subtraction from, improvement to, or maintenance of, any building, highway, road, railroad, excavation, or other structure, project, development, or improvement attached to real estate, including moving and demolition in connection therewith.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 264 s 2.]